Maine, session 132, LD419.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §1802 is enacted to read:
§1802. Auditor of center
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Auditor" means the auditor of the center pursuant to this section.
B. "Committee" means the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over criminal justice and public safety matters.
C. "De-identified" means, with respect to a report, that personally identifiable
information has been removed from or obscured in the report so that the report does
not identify a person and reasonably cannot be used to identify a person.
2. Creation and appointment of position. There is created within the Office of the
Attorney General the position of auditor of the center. The auditor must be appointed by
the Attorney General without regard to political affiliation and, as determined by the
Attorney General, must be a person qualified by integrity and demonstrated ability in
relevant fields.
3. Powers and duties. The auditor shall provide systematic, ongoing oversight of the
center to ensure the transparency and accountability of its operations and to ensure that the
center operates within the law and in a manner that preserves the privacy, civil liberties and
civil rights of all persons in the State. The auditor:
A. Shall assist the committee in the oversight duties of the committee over the center;
B. Shall maintain a publicly accessible website that includes the de-identified
informational reports provided to the committee by the center pursuant to section 1801
and by the auditor pursuant to subsection 4;
C. Shall include as part of the publicly accessible website described in paragraph B a
means by which a person may submit questions or complaints about the auditor or
center. The identity of a person who submits a good faith complaint to the auditor
against the center using the website or by other means is confidential and the auditor
shall maintain the identity of that person as confidential; and
D. May select the type and extent of reviews of center activities to conduct.
4. Reporting. The auditor shall provide the following reports to the committee:
A. A report no later than April 1st each year beginning in 2026 regarding the oversight
of the center;
B. An interim progress report no later than September 15th each year beginning in
2026, including progress made on any goals established by the auditor in prior reports
and any obstacles the auditor has found in fulfilling the requirements of this section;
C. A report whenever the center refuses a data request or to make personnel available
for auditor interviews, if known by the auditor, including the reason for the refusal, if
known by the auditor; and
D. Other reports as the auditor determines necessary.
Page 1 - 132LR0931(01)

A report provided by the auditor to the committee pursuant to this subsection and posted
on the auditor's publicly accessible website pursuant to subsection 3, paragraph B must be
de-identified and may not contain any information that is confidential or is otherwise not
authorized by law to be disseminated to the public. The auditor shall redact from a report
required by this subsection any information that is prohibited by law from disclosure, is
sensitive and pertains to an ongoing investigation of criminal activity or would cause a
specific and imminent threat to safety.
5. Limitations. The auditor may not:
A. Require the center to take corrective action; or
B. Disclose the name or other personally identifying information of an informant,
witness or suspect or other source of information to the center.
6. Center cooperation. The center shall make available documents and personnel as
requested by the auditor.
7. Commissioner input. The Commissioner of Public Safety may present to the
committee a response to an issue reported by the auditor pursuant to subsection 4.
Sec. 2. 25 MRSA §1803 is enacted to read:
§1803. Public record
Information shared by the center with a private entity that is not designated as classified
or confidential under any federal or state law, regulation or rule is a public record within
the meaning of the Freedom of Access Act.
Sec. 3. Auditor of Maine Information and Analysis Center; report. The
auditor appointed pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 25, section 1802 shall
review the Maine Information and Analysis Center's record-keeping and information-
sharing practices, particularly with respect to its intelligence-gathering and dissemination
practices, and assess the policies used by the center to determine the quality or veracity of
the information the center receives and whether those policies appropriately consider the
privacy, civil liberties and civil rights of all persons in this State. The auditor shall also
determine whether the center's practices comply with the requirements of federal laws and
regulations regarding criminal intelligence collection, retention and sharing that are
applicable to the center, including, but not limited to, 28 Code of Federal Regulations, Part
23. The auditor shall include the results of the review under this section along with any
recommendations in the first report the auditor submits to the joint standing committee of
the Legislature having jurisdiction over criminal justice and public safety matters pursuant
to Title 25, section 1802, subsection 4. After reviewing the report, the joint standing
committee may report out legislation relating to the report.
As used in this section, "auditor" has the same meaning as in the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 25, section 1802, subsection 1, paragraph A and "Maine Information and
Analysis Center" or "center" has the same meaning as in Title 25, section 1801.